Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 17. Mississippi Principal and Income Act of 2013

§ 91-17-1
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-1. [Codes, 1942, § 672-186; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 16, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-3
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§ 91-17-. [Codes, 1942, § 672-171; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-5
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-5. [Codes, 1942, § 672-172; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-7
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-7. [Codes, 1942, § 672-173; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-9
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-9. [Codes, 1942, § 672-174; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-11
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-11. [Codes, 1942, § 672-175; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-13
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-13. [Codes, 1942, § 672-176; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-15
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-15. [Codes, 1942, § 672-177; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-17
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-17. [Codes, 1942, § 672-178; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-19
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-19. [[Codes, 1942, § 672-179; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-21
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-21. [Codes, 1942, § 672-180; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-23
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-23. [Codes, 1942, § 672-181; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-25
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-25. [Codes, 1942, § 672-183; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-27
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-27. [Codes, 1942, § 672-183; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-29
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-29. [Codes, 1942, § 672-184; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 14, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]

§ 91-17-31
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 2, effective from and after January 1, 2013.

§91-17-31. [Codes, 1942, § 672-185; Laws, 1966, ch. 371, § 15, eff from and after January 1, 1967.]